Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-605
Seller of multifamily dwelling; duties; interior alterations requiring permit; owner; duties; prohibited acts.

(1) The seller of a dwelling unit of an existing multifamily dwelling shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling unit or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling unit is located when the dwelling unit is offered for sale or transfer on or after January 1, 2017, if the dwelling unit has a fuel-fired heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage.

(2) The owner of a dwelling unit of a multifamily dwelling shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling unit or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling unit is located if the dwelling unit has a fuel-fired heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage and if the owner, on or after January 1, 2017, makes any of the following where a permit is required: Any interior alteration, repair, fuel-fired appliance replacement, or addition.

(3) No person shall remove batteries from, or in any way render inoperable, a carbon monoxide alarm except as part of a process to inspect, maintain, repair, or replace the alarm or replace the batteries in the alarm.

Laws 2015, LB34, § 5.
August 30, 2015